Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.620

Official controls—Action by board.

Upon receipt of any recommended official control or amendment thereto, the board shall at its next regular public meeting set the date for a public meeting where it may, by ordinance, adopt or reject the official control or amendment.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.620. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 62.]